Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.100

Place of business.

(1) Every hearing aid specialist, audiologist, speech-language pathologist, or interim permit holder, who is regulated under this chapter, shall notify the department in writing of the regular address of the place or places in the state of Washington where the person practices or intends to practice more than twenty consecutive business days and of any change thereof within ten days of such change. Failure to notify the department in writing shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of the license or interim permit.

(2) The department shall keep a record of the places of business of persons who hold licenses or interim permits.

(3) Any notice required to be given by the department to a person who holds a license or interim permit may be given by mailing it to the address of the last establishment or facility of which the person has notified the department, except that notice to a licensee or interim permit holder of proceedings to deny, suspend, or revoke the license or interim permit shall be by certified or registered mail or by means authorized for service of process.

[ 2014 c 189 s 8; 2002 c 310 s 10; 1998 c 142 s 6; 1996 c 200 s 13; 1983 c 39 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 10.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.